staging/apertium-pol-ces/dev/wikt.full-form.pl.dix
    <pardef n="minera/ł__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l>ł</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ł</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>łu</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>łowi</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>le</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>łem</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>le</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ły</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ły</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>łów</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>łom</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>łach</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>łami</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ły</l><r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pier/ś__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ś</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ś</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>si</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>si</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>si</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sią</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>si</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>si</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>si</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>si</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>siom</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>siach</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>siami</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>si</l><r>ś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="minerał"><i>minera</i><par n="minera/ł__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="pierś"><i>pier</i><par n="pier/ś__n_f"/></e>
